I. MONETARY AND EXCHANGE RATE ISSUES 
A. Legal convergence 

1. Please provide a copy of the central bank law and possibly of other important monetary and financial laws (in one of the official EU languages). 
The following laws in English are enclosed:  1.  Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, "Official Gazette of RM" No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004, see 11_nnex_012.  Banking Law "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 63/2000, 103/2000, 37/2002, 51/2003 and 85/2003, see 11_nnex_023.  Law on Foreign Exchange Operations "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 34/2001, 49/2001, 103/2001, 54/2002 and 51/2003, see 11_nnex_034.  Law on Payment Operations "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 32/2001, 50/2001, 52/2001, 103/2001, 37/2002, 41/2002, 61/2002 and 42/2003, see 11_nnex_045.  Law on Investment Funds "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 9/2000, see 11_nnex_056.  Law on Taking Over Joint Stock Companies "Official Gazette of the RM" No 4/2002 and  37/2002, see 11_nnex_067.  Law on Establishing the Macedonian Bank for Development Promotion "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 24/1998 and  6/2000, see 11_nnex_078.  Law on Micro-Financing Banks "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 61/2002, see 11_nnex_089.  Law on Deposits Insurance Fund "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 63/2000, 29/2002, 43/2002 and 49/2003, see 11_nnex_0910. Law on Leasing "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 4/2002 and 49/2003, see 11_nnex_1011. Law on Default Interest Level "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 65/1992 and 70/1993, see 11_nnex_1112. Law on Supervision of Insurance "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 27/2002, 84/2002, 98/2002 and 33/2004, see 11_nnex_1213. Law on Mandatory Fully Funded Pension Insurance "Official Gazette of the RM" No. 29/2002, 85/2003 and 40/2004, see 11_nnex_13
2. What are in your view the necessary reforms in national legislation (central bank law, laws on insurance companies, pension funds, social security funds, compensation funds, banking sector, interest rates, exchange rate law, etc.) with a view to EU membership requirements? Which reforms are already underway? 
The following reforms should be implemented with a view to meeting the EU membership requirements: CENTRAL BANK 
The Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004) adopted in early 2002, along with the amendments that followed to June 2004 inclusive, is largely compliant with the European regulation pertaining to the objective and the organization of the central banks in the European Union member states, primarily with the Statute of the European System of Central Banks and the European Central Bank. The Draft Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia is subject to discussion, which should enter into a parliamentary procedure in the second half of 2005. The new law, inter alia, shall include:   further designing and specification of the four types of independence of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia (functional, institutional, personal and financial) as a fundamental prerequisite for achieving its primary objective, that is the price stability.   possibility for the Governor, or the Vice Governor, acting in the capacity of a Deputy Governor to attend the sessions of the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia and to express their opinions and views whenever the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia adopts laws pertaining to the achievement of the primary objective and the performance of the functions of the National Bank;   further specification of the provision pertaining to the protection against any conflict of interest of the National Bank Council members;   redefinition of the provisions specifying the capital and the reserves, the revenues and the expenditures, in accordance with the accounting rules, standards and principles of the European Central Bank;   regulation of the relation of the National Bank with the European Union, by introducing provisions which state that on the date of accession of the Republic of Macedonia to the European Union the National Bank will become an integral part of the European System of Central Banks and it will carry out its tasks in accordance with Article 43 of the Statute of the European System of Central Banks and the European Central Bank which apply to the member states with a derogation; the Governor of the National Bank will be a member of the General Council of the European Central Bank and the National Bank will cooperate with the European Central Bank in accordance with the Statute of the European System of Central Banks and the European Central Bank with regard to recording, compiling, processing and publishing data and information. 
BANKING SECTOR 
The reforms of the banking sector are underway and in an advanced stage. As a result, most of the national legislation is harmonized with the one of the Union.  In 2004, the Project on Technical Assistance to the banking sector in the Republic of Macedonia was delivered, supported by the CARDS Program, within which an analysis was made on the banking sector harmonization degree. The analysis and the Reports on the Project Delivery also indicate high degree of compliance of the domestic legislation in the area of banking sector. The following reforms should be implemented with a view to meeting the EU membership requirements:    provision enabling of unrestricted banking services in the Republic of Macedonia through branches (without a status of a legal entity) by banks from member states and non-member states. The opportunity to open branches will also transpose the regulation for insurance schemes of home member state, for annual accounts, for reorganization and winding up of credit institutions. Completion period: January 1, 2008;   regulation of electronic money institutions. Completion period: end-2007;   implementation of the Capital Adequacy Directive (Directive 93/6/EEC) with regard to the market risk. Completion period: end-2005;   strengthening of the regulation for reorganization of banks facing difficulties in their operations. Completion period: end-2005. Reforms in the banking sector which are underway, and which will be completed by the end of 2005 1. Preparation of amendments to the Banking Law is underway, which will govern:   the procedure and the measures against banks facing difficulties in their operations (receivership - reorganization, rehabilitation) by strengthening the role of the supervisory authorities;   the legal ground for market risk regulation and management;   the banks will be released from the restriction for investing in financial institutions (compliance with Article 51 (2) of Directive 2000/12/EC)   the initial capital for founding a bank will increase to Euro 5 million (compliance with Article 5(1) of Directive 2000/12/EC);   the definition of affiliates by fully accepting the method of defining affiliates in accordance with the European Directive 2000/12 which pertains to founding and operating credit institutions (Article 1, item 25 of the Directive);   the non-performance of banking operations by the bank in a period exceeding 6 months, instead of 1 year as specified previously, to be a criterion for revoking the bank founding and operating license (compliance with Article 14, sub-item a) of the Directive 2000/12/EC);   the definition of the type of financial activities which may be performed by the banks in accordance with Annex 1 to the Directive 2000/12/EC. 2. Preparation of the regulation, which will set forth the status of the savings houses, is underway. Completion period: end-2005. INSURANCE 
More relevant reforms in the national legislation in the area of insurance were made by the adoption of the Law on Supervision of Insurance in April 2002 (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 27/2002, 84/2002, 98/2002, 33/2004). The following activities are planned to be performed, for full acceptance and implementation of the acquis communautaire and the IAIS standards and principles:   amendment to the Law on Supervision of Insurance aimed at strengthening the supervisory function and increasing the independence of the supervisory body;   adoption of a new law on obligatory car insurance with the aim of implementing the IV Directive of the European Union in the area of motor third party liability (MTPL) and improving the compulsory insurance system efficiency. Completion period: end-2005   adoption of by-laws which regulate precise specific issues regarding the insurance companies' operations (solvency requirements, technical requirements, fit and proper requirements, etc.). Completion period: end-2005 
CAPITAL MARKET 
A new Securities Law has been drafted which should enter into a parliamentary procedure in early 2005. The new law requires large compliance with the four European Directives 93/6/EEC, 93/22/EEC, 89/298/EEC and 2001/34/EC as follows: it specifies the procedure for issuing new securities by a public offer, it simplifies the procedure for issuing new securities by private placement, it standardizes the self-regulating function of the authorized depositories and stock exchanges, it determines the forbidden investments and activities of the authorized depositories and stock exchanges, it specifies the grounds and the documentation underlying the transfers of securities which are not made by trading, it strengthens the minimum criteria and introduces a legal requirement regarding the adherence to the rules for listing on the authorized stock exchanges, it sets the allowed methods of trading on the authorized stock exchanges, it specifies the services related to securities that may be provided by the brokerage firms and the banks, it allows the subsidiaries of foreign brokerage firms / banks to provide services related to securities in the Republic of Macedonia, with a permission given by the Securities and Exchange Commission, it specifies the procedure for granting an operating license to individual brokers and determines their responsibilities, it specifies the obligations regarding disclosure of data on the joint stock companies which are maintained at the Registry of the Securities and Exchange Commission, it defines the reports submitted by the joint stock companies to the Securities and Exchange Commission, including special reporting requirements, it precisely defines the forbidden activities in the operations with securities, it specifies the manner of operation of the Securities and Exchange Commission and it strengthens its supervisory function and independence. In the first half of 2005, amendments to the Law on Investment Funds (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 9/2000), will be adopted with the aim of further harmonizing with the European directives which regulate the investment funds operations, and it will enter into force.  
FOREIGN EXCHANGE OPERATIONS  
The legal ground for the reforms of the foreign exchange operations are incorporated in the Law on Foreign Exchange Operations ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 34/2001, 49/2001, 103/2001, 54/2002 and 51/2003). The law stipulates the pace of the capital transfers liberalization in accordance with the Stabilization and Association Agreement. The dynamics of the liberalization is elaborated in details in the answers to the questions 04_I_ 204_I_3 and 04_I_4
PENSION SYSTEM The reform of the pension system in the Republic of Macedonia, in the light of introducing multipillar pension system was established by the Law on Amending the Pension and Disability Compensation Insurance Law, adopted in March 2000 ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 24/2000). Furthermore, the Law on Mandatory Fully Funded Pension Insurance, adopted in May 2002 ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 29/2002) more closely and systematically specified the mandatory fully funded pension insurance.  The structure of the future multipillar pension system is based on three types (pillars) of insurance as follows: -  mandatory pension and disability compensation insurance based on generation solidarity (first pillar). This type of insurance will provide exercising of rights arising from the pension and disability compensation insurance in the case of old age, disability and decease, meaning that a part of the old-age pension, disability pension, family pension and the lowest amount of pension is paid; mandatory fully funded pension insurance (second pillar) which will ensure payment of a part of the old-age pension; voluntary fully funded pension insurance (third pillar) which will provide insurance of the persons not covered with the mandatory pension and disability compensation insurance, and it also gives an opportunity for higher pension for insurers who, besides the mandatory contribution for pension and disability insurance, will decide, voluntarily, to allocate additional funds from their income.  The European Union Directives contain no special requirements for the mandatory fully funded pension insurance design. There is a Directive 2003/41/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council from 03.06.2003 on the activities and supervision of institutions for occupational retirement provision which pertains to the occupational pension schemes, the features of which do not require a level of mandatory insurance in a manner in which the system of mandatory fully funded pension insurance in the Republic of Macedonia is designed in line with the Law on Mandatory Fully Funded Pension Insurance. The non-mandatory (voluntary) nature of the fully funded pension insurance (third pillar) in the Republic of Macedonia, the grounds of which are established by the legal framework in accordance with the Law on Amending the Pension and Disability Compensation Insurance Law ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 80/93, 3/94, 14/95, 71/96, 32/97, 49/97, 24/00, 96/00, 50/01, 85/03, 50/04, 4/05), is not conflicting the directives of the European Union. A special law is planned to be adopted on voluntary fully funded pension insurance taking account of the recommendations of the European Union which pertain to such type of insurance. B. Central bank independence 
Institutional independence 

1. What are the objectives and tasks of the central bank, as defined by its statutes and in practice? 
In accordance with the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004) hereinafter referred to as: Law, the main objective of the National Bank is to maintain the price stability (Article 3, paragraph 1 of the Law). The National Bank supports the economic policy of the country and the financial stability of the country without jeopardizing the realization of the main objective, and adhering to the principles of the market economy (Article 3, paragraph 2 of the Law). The National Bank performs the following functions (Article 10 of the Law): establishes and conducts the monetary policy; regulates the general liquidity of the banking system; regulates the liquidity in the international payments; establishes and conducts the Denar exchange rate policy; holds and manages the foreign exchange reserves; regulates the payment system in accordance with a law; coordinates the payments and settlement of accounts among banks and distributes cash; grants founding and operating license to a bank and a savings house and supervises the banks and savings houses; grants a license for performing services of prompt money transfer and supervises the operations of the entities performing services of prompt money transfer in accordance with a law; -  grants operating license to foreign exchange bureaus and supervises their operations in accordance with a law;  acts as a custodian of the pension funds, in accordance with a law; issues banknotes and coins; purchases rare and original coins found on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia; performs activities for the account of the central government and the government administration bodies; represents the Republic of Macedonia in the international financial institutions in accordance with this Law;  establishes an IT system; and -  establishes and maintains a Data Registry of the credit exposure of legal entities and natural persons to banks and savings houses founded in the Republic of Macedonia.   
2. What is the degree of functional independence of the central bank from public authorities (President, Government, especially Ministry of Finance, Parliament, etc.)? What is the specific role of those actors in the functioning of the central bank? Describe the present situation both in legal terms (information based on the central bank law) and in practice. 
The National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia enjoys a high degree of functional independence guaranteed under the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia  and the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004, (hereinafter referred to as: Law). In accordance with Article 60 of the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, the National Bank is independent and responsible for the stability of the currency, for the monetary policy and for the general liquidity of domestic and international payments. In accordance with Articles 4 and 5 of the Law, the National Bank is independent in performing its functions, enjoying financial and administrative independence. When performing its functions, the National Bank and the members of the decision-making bodies neither require nor get instructions from the central government and the administrative bodies (Article 4 of the Law). The National Bank determines the instruments and measures for performing its functions (Article 11 of the Law). The National Bank independently determines its own interest rates (Article 17 of the Law). The National Bank may carry out deposit operations, placement and trading with securities, payment operations and other financial activities for the account of the central government and government administration bodies (Article 50 of the Law). According to the Law, the National Bank represents the Republic of Macedonia in the international financial institutions (Article 53 of the Law). The Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia appoints the Governor and the external members of the National Bank Council upon proposal of the President of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 60 of the Law). The relation between the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia and the National Bank is governed by the following legal provisions: The National Bank Council as well as each of its members are responsible to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia for performing the functions and tasks of the National Bank (Article 61 of the Law). The Governor and the Vice-Governors are responsible for their  operations to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia (Articles 71 and 74 of the Law).   If the National Bank Council fails to pass a decision and the Governor of the National Bank estimates that it may lead to serious disturbances in the accomplishment of the main objective, the Governor submits a report to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia containing the opinions of each individual member of the National Bank Council, and adopts the decision on which consent was not reached (Article 67 of the Law). The competent commissions in the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia, convene a meeting with the Governor at least once in six months, in order to be informed on the National Bank operations (Article 55-a of the Law). The National Bank submits the following reports to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia, in order to keep it informed (Article 55 of the Law):  1.  semi-annual and annual report on  its’ operations;  2.  semi-annual and annual report on the supervision and the undertaken measures against banks and savings houses;  3.  semi-annual and annual report on  managing the foreign exchange  reserves. The relation between the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and the National Bank is governed by the following legal provisions: To increase the initial capital of the National Bank prior approval of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia is required (Article 8, paragraph 2 of the Law). The Minister of Finance and the Governor of the National Bank conclude an agreement for handling and managing the foreign exchange reserves of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 27 of the Law). The National Bank, in compliance with the balance of payments projection, monitors international credit relations. If certain divergence from the balance of payments projection is identified, the National Bank informs the Government of the Republic of Macedonia and proposes measures for preventing or eliminating the causes that contribute to the divergence from the balance of payments projection (Article 19 of the Law). The National Bank notifies the Ministry of Finance, in writing, on granting and revoking a license for founding and operating a bank and a savings house and on status changes, within 7 days after the date of the effectiveness of the Decision on granting, i.e. revoking a license (Article 30-a of the Law). The Minister of Finance may participate in the National Bank Council sessions and discussions, without being entitled to vote (Article 63 of the Law). In practice, the National Bank is in constant cooperation with the Ministry of Finance in order to implement the legal regulations from the area of finance and banking continuously and unabridgedly.  For the purpose of efficient implementation of the set macroeconomic policy of the Republic of Macedonia, the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia and the Decision on the objectives of the monetary policy of the National Bank, i.e. coordination of the fiscal and monetary policies, the Ministry of Finance and the National Bank signed a Protocol, under which a Committee for coordination of the fiscal and the monetary policies is established. The cooperation between the Governor of the National Bank and the Minister of Finance is carried out also through informal meetings, depending on the need for bidirectional  informing about key issues from the macroeconomic policy, which is based on the established tradition.  3. Does the central bank act provide for the following prohibitions for third parties: a) to give instructions; b) to approve, suspend, annul or defer decisions; c) to censor decisions on legal grounds; d) to participate in decision-making bodies of the central bank with a voting right; e) to require ex-ante consultation on the central bank’s decisions? 
a)   The National Bank is independent in performing its functions, in accordance with the Constitution of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 50/91 and the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004) (hereinafter: Law). When performing their functions, the National Bank and the members of the decision-making bodies neither require nor get instructions from the central government and the administrative bodies (Article 4 of the Law). 
b)   There is no provision  in the Law that pertains to this issue. However, the prohibition for third parties to approve, suspend, annul or defer decisions is implicitly specified by Article 4 paragraph 1 of the Law, according to which the National Bank is independent in performing its functions.  
c)   There is no provision  in the Law that pertains to this issue. However, the prohibition for third parties to censor decisions is implicitly specified by Article 4 paragraph 1 of the Law, according to which the National Bank is independent in performing its functions. 
d)   The Law explicitly specifies the National Bank's decision-making bodies and no third party takes part in the decision-making process of the National Bank with a voting right. The Minister of Finance may participate in the sessions of the Council of the National Bank  and participate in the discussions, without being entitled to vote (Article 63 of the Law). 
e)   There is no provision  in the Law that pertains to this issue. However, the prohibition for third parties to require ex ante consultations with respect to the decisions of the National Bank is implicitly specified by Article 4 paragraph 2 of the Law, according to which the National Bank and the members of the decision-making bodies shall neither require nor get instructions from the central government and the administrative bodies. 
4. Does the central bank have any ex-ante reporting obligations towards other authorities regarding its monetary policies? 
The National Bank has no ex-ante reporting obligations towards other bodies and institutions regarding its monetary policy. The National Bank designs and conducts the monetary policy and determines the monetary policy measures and instruments (Articles 10 and 11 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004). The National Bank Council decides on the monetary policy objectives with two-thirds majority of votes of all its members (Article 67 paragraph 3 of the Law). The National Bank submits the decision on the monetary policy objectives and the monetary policy projection to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia and publishes them two months after they are adopted by the National Bank Council at the latest (Article 54 of the Law). 
5. How is the management of the central bank organised (composition and responsibilities of the governing bodies, in particular the managing board)? 
The bodies of the National Bank of Macedonia (the Central Bank) are: the Council of the National Bank  and the Governor of the National Bank (Article 56 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004). The  Council of the National Bank of Macedonia consists of the Governor of the National Bank, two Vice-Governors and six external members (Article 57 of the Law). The  Council of the National Bank (Article 64 of the Law): 1.  adopts the decision on the monetary policy objectives; 2.  adopts the measures and instruments for conducting  monetary policy and monitors its  implementation;  3.  determines the Denar exchange rate policy; 4.  adopts the National Bank Financial Plan and Annual Financial Statement; 5.  adopts the National Bank Statute; 6.  decides on the issuance and putting into circulation of new denominations of banknotes and coins as well as their  withdrawal from circulation;  7.  determines the manner and conditions for purchasing and selling gold and other precious metals; 8.  decides on establishing a numismatic collection of rare and original coins found on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia; 9.  prescribes rules and standards of  pursuing control and prudent banking supervision; 10. determines the types of instruments for securing credits extended to banks and savings houses and the conditions for their usage;  11. decides on the amount, purpose and the manner of usage of the initial capital; 12. decides on the foreign reserves management policy; 13. adopts the Annual and Semi-Annual Reports; 14. decides on the uniform tariff for levying charges for the services rendered by the National Bank; 15. selects an authorized auditing entity and adopts the auditing report on the National Bank operations; 16. adopts an operation plan for the Internal Audit Department; 17. appoints and dismisses the manager of the Internal Audit Department and decides on the termination of the employment of the manager; 18. monitors the operations of the Internal Audit Department and adopts the reports on the Department’s operations; 19. decides upon appeals against decisions taken by the Governor; 20. adopts the Annual and Semi-Annual Reports on Supervision and the undertaken measures; 21. adopts the Annual and Semi-Annual Reports on handling the Foreign Exchange Reserves, and 22. decides on other issues, which according to the Law are considered as issues within the competence of the National Bank, and are not within the competence of the Governor of the National Bank. In case of appeal against the decision of the Governor, the Council of the National Bank  shall decide in absence of the Governor and the Vice-Governors (Article 67 of the Law) The Governor of the National Bank represents the National Bank. The Governor of the National Bank takes decisions and adopts other general acts on the National Bank operations, which, according  the Law, are not within the competence of the National Bank Council and informs the National Bank Council on the decisions taken and general acts, adopted, in the first subsequent session (Article 68 of the Law). The Governor of the National Bank is authorized to adopt manuals for uniform implementation of by-laws adopted by the National Bank Council (Article 69, paragraph 1 of the Law). The Governor of the National Bank manages and organizes the operations of the National Bank and takes decisions related to employment issues and financial operations, in accordance with his/her authorizations (Article 76 of the Law). The Governor independently decides on the employment, promotion, reassignment, training, determination of the salary and other benefits, rewards for special engagement in work, imposing discipline measures, financial liability of the employees and termination of the employment (Article 78 of the Law). The Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia and the Statute of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, see 11_Annex_14, stipulate that the Governor shall authorize one Vice-Governor between the Vice-Governors-members of the Council of the National Bank, to act in the capacity of a Governor, with all rights and duties in managing of the operations of the National Bank.  In accordance with the Article 17 of the Statute of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, employees with special rights and responsibilities in the National Bank are the Secretary General and the managers of departments. 
6. Which provisions ensure democratic accountability and transparency of the central bank? 
The democratic accountability and transparency of the National Bank of Macedonia is ensured through the following legal provisions: -  The National Bank is a legal entity in the sole ownership of the state, with financial and administrative independence (Article 5 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004); -  The Governor, the Vice-Governors and the external members of the Council are responsible to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia for their acts (Articles 61, 71 and 74 of the Law); Appointment and dismissal of the Governor, the Vice-Governors and the external members of the National Bank Council (Articles 60, 70, 72 and 73 of the Law); The competent commissions in the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia, at least once in six months, convene a meeting with the Governor in order to be informed on the National Bank operations (Article 55-a of the Law); The Decisions of the Council of the National Bank are adopted in sessions, with majority of votes of all members of the National Bank Council. The National Bank Council decides on the decision on the monetary policy objectives with a two-thirds majority (Articles 63 and 67 of the Law); The decisions of the National Bank Council are obligatorily published in the   “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia”, except for the decisions referred to in items 5, 16, 18, 19 and 21 of Article 64 of the Law. (Article 65 of the Law); The Governor of the National Bank informs the National Bank Council on the decisions taken and other general acts adopted. The manuals and other regulations adopted by the Governor, which pertain to the operations of banks are published in the “Official Gazette of the Republic of Macedonia” (Articles 68 and 69 of the Law);  -  The National Bank submits the decision on the monetary policy objectives and the monetary policy projection to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia and publishes them two months after they are adopted by the National Bank Council (Article 54 of the Law).   The National Bank submits the following reports to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia: semi-annual and annual report on the operations of the National Bank; semi-annual and annual report on the supervision and the undertaken measures against banks and savings houses; and semi-annual and annual report on handling the foreign exchange reserves. The National Bank is obligated to publish the reports at the latest  six months from the  expiration of the period they refer to (Article 55 of the Law); -  The National Bank Council selects an independent authorized auditing  entity, which examines and assesses the Financial Statements of the National Bank and adopts the auditing report on the National Bank operations (Article 64 paragraph 1 item 15 and Article 93 of the Law); -  The Annual Financial Statements of the National Bank are prepared in accordance with the International Accounting Standards and accounting regulations (Article 91 of the Law). The Annual Financial Statements of the National Bank are an integral part of the Annual Report of the National Bank, which is published. (Article 92 of the Law). The National Bank publishes the auditing report of the authorized auditing house and it prepares and publishes monthly financial statements (Article 94 of the Law); -  The National Bank gathers, processes, publishes and distributes data and information, relevant for performance of its function (Articles 40 and 41 of the Law); After each session of the National Bank Council, a press release is posted on the web site of the National Bank in order to inform the public on the operations of the National Bank Council. The web site of the National Bank enables the public to obtain information on the following: the agendas and the conclusions from the sessions of the National Bank Council, the press releases  regarding conducting the monetary policy  (explaining the measures and changes); the quarterly reports, the quarterly bulletins, the annual report of the National Bank, the monthly reports, the economic researches, as well as the open invitations for public procurements realized for the needs of the National Bank. The employees in the National Bank perform their duties and assignments in accordance with the Code of Conduct of the Employees of the National Bank, which is based on the following principles: principle of integrity, principle of objectivity, principle of professional competence, principle of efficiency, principle of professional conduct, principle of priority of interests, principle of protection of property, principle of esteeming clients and business partners, principle of confidentiality of data, principle of ban on receiving gifts and treats; principle of limiting the external activities, principle of limiting the disclosure of information, public appearance and publicity, and principle of independence. 
Personal independence 

7. What are the appointment and removal conditions and procedures for the central bank governor and the other members of the decision-making bodies of the central bank? 
In accordance with Article 70 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004, (hereinafter: Law), the Governor of the National Bank is appointed and relieved from office by the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia, upon proposal of the President of the Republic of Macedonia, for a term of seven years, and is eligible for one more consecutive appointment.  The National Bank appoints three Vice-Governors. The Vice-Governors are appointed by the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia upon proposal of the Governor, for a term of seven years, and are eligible for one more consecutive appointment (Article 72 of the Law). The Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia appoints the external members of the National Bank Council, for a term of seven years, upon proposal of the President of the Republic of Macedonia, without being eligible for consecutive appointment (Article 60 of the Law). The longer term of office of the Governor, the Vice-Governors and the National Bank Council external members, relative to the term of office of the Government and the President of the State, ensures their personal independence.  The members of the National Bank Council are citizens of the Republic of Macedonia and have a Higher Education in the area of economics or law and working experience of at least five of the last ten years prior to the appointment, in the area of finance, banking or  academic activity in the area of economics. The term of office of the Governor, the Vice-Governors and the external member of the National Bank Council terminates (Articles 60, 70 and 73 of the Law): after the expiration of a seven-year period from the date of his/her appointment; in case of decease; in case of his/her resignation; in case of relieving from office.  A Governor, a Vice-Governor and an external member of the National Bank Council may be relieved from office:  in the case she/he is sentenced to imprisonment for a criminal act, as follows: a)  in the period from the effectiveness of the sentence to the day of serving out the sentence, and five years after the sentence is being served out, in the case of effective court sentence of up to three years of imprisonment; b)  in the period from the effectiveness of the sentence to the day of serving out the sentence, and ten years after the sentence is being served out, in the case of effective court sentence of over three years of imprisonment; if the court imposed a security measure for ban on practicing a profession, performing activity or duty  as a manager in an institution; in case of a long-lasting serious disease, which prevents him/her from performing the obligations; if she/he losts her/his business abilities; and  if she/he performs the function and the competence entrusted to her/him by the Law dishonestly, non-conscientiously, irresponsibly, unprofessionally and untimely. A Governor, a Vice-Governor and an external member of the National Bank Council are relieved from office in an identical procedure as for their appointment. 8. Do the statutes of the central bank comply with the following requirements: a) minimum term of office of the Governor should be at least 5 years (indicate the current term of office); b) grounds for dismissal of the Governor may not be different from the following: if the Governor no longer fulfils the conditions required for the performance of his/her duties or if he is guilty of serious misconduct; c) security of tenure of other members of decision-making bodies of the central bank (how long is the term of their office?) and grounds for their dismissal should be similar to those here above mentioned d) membership of a decision-making body involved in the performance of the central bank's tasks is incompatible with the exercise of other functions that might create a conflict of interest (are members authorised to hold part-time jobs?); e) right of judicial review of any dismissal decision by independent national courts? 
a) Pursuant to Article 70 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia ("Official Gazette of RM", No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004) hereinafter referred to as: the Law, the term of office of the Governor of the National Bank is 7 years.  
b) The grounds for dismissal of the Governor are prescribed in Article 60 paragraph 4 of the Law, as follows: 1) in the case she/he is sentenced to imprisonment for a criminal act, if the court imposed a security measure for ban on practicing a profession, performing activity or duty, in case of a long-lasting serious disease, which prevents him/her from performing the obligations, and if she/he lost her/his business abilities which implies revocation because the Governor no longer fulfills the terms for performing the function; and 2) if she/he performs the function and the competence entrusted to her/him by the Law dishonestly, non-conscientiously, irresponsibly, unprofessionally and untimely, which implies relief from office due to violation of his/her business authorizations. The terms for the relieve from office of the Governor are explained in details in the answer to question 11_I_B_7
c) The external members of the National Bank Council are appointed by the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia, upon a proposal of the President of the Republic of Macedonia for a term of seven years. Regarding the dismissal of the external members of the National Bank Council, the provisions of Article 60 of the Law are applied, according to which the external member of the National Bank  Council may be dismissed: in the case she/he is sentenced to imprisonment for a criminal act, as follows: a)  in the period from the effectiveness of the sentence to the day of serving out the sentence, and five years after the sentence is being served out, in the case of effective court sentence of up to three years of imprisonment; b)  in the period from the effectiveness of the sentence to the day of serving out the sentence, and ten years after the sentence is being served out, in the case of effective court sentence of over three years of imprisonment; if the court imposed a security measure for ban on practicing a profession, performing activity or duty as a manager in an institution; in case of a long-lasting serious disease, which prevents him/her from fulfilling the obligations; if she/he lost her/his business abilities; and  if she/he performs the function and the competence entrusted to her/him by the Law dishonestly, non-conscientiously, irresponsibly, unprofessionally and untimely. 
d)  The members of the National Bank Council may not perform duties which lead to a conflict of interests. Pursuant to Article 58 of the Law, a member of the National Bank Council may not be:  a member of a bank or savings house bodies; employee in a bank or savings house;   person holding managing position in a bank or a savings house against which a bankruptcy proceeding has been initiated; official that manages a government body, public enterprise or local government;   a person against whom the court imposed a security measure for ban on practicing profession and performing activity or duty; a member of trade union administrative bodies; net debtor or representative of a net debtor in a bank or savings house; manager of a company which is a major owner of  a bank;   shareholder who owns more than 10% of the shares with managing right in a bank or savings house; and a person sentenced to imprisonment for a criminal act, as follows: a)  in the period from the effectiveness of the sentence to the day of serving out the sentence, and five years after the sentence is being served out, in the case of effective court sentence of up to three years of imprisonment; b)  in the period from the effectiveness of the sentence to the day of serving out the sentence, and ten years after the sentence is being served out, in the case of effective court sentence of over three years of imprisonment; A member of the National Bank Council and the Vice-Governor who is not a member of the National Bank Council may not be members of the management bodies of a bank or a savings house, may not be employed by or establish a bank or a savings house during the term of office and two years after the expiration of their term of office or their dismissal. (Article 58 paragraph 3 of the Law) A person who is a member of a political party may be a member of the National Bank Council only if she/he voluntarily withdraws from the party during her/his mandate in the National Bank Council (Article 58 paragraph 4 of the Law). The National Bank Council members are required to give a statement on conflict of interests, if any, at least once at the beginning of every year. If the objectivity of a National Bank Council member is at stake due to the conflict of interests, the Council member is obliged to give a statement prior to the process of deciding on that issue and to be excluded from the decision-making (Article 62 of the Law). The Governor and the Vice-Governors are employed in the National Bank on a full-time basis, while the external members of the National Bank Council do not have a status of employed persons of the National Bank. The external members of the National Bank Council receive remuneration from the funds of the National Bank (Article 62 of the Law). e) The Law does not contain any provision referring to this issue. 
Financial independence 

9. Is the central bank in a position to avail itself of the appropriate means to ensure that its tasks can be properly fulfilled? Does a consultation on and/or right exist for a third party to amend or approve the central bank’s draft budget and annual accounts? 
The National Bank of Macedonia has a full financial and administrative independence (Article 5 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004). The Financial Plan (draft budget) and the Financial Statements of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia are adopted by the National Bank Council (Article 92 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia). There are no consultations or rights for a third party to modify or approve the Central Bank's draft budget and the annual accounts. The following provisions of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia governs its financial position:    The capital of the National Bank consists of initial capital and reserves. The capital of the National Bank is neither transferable nor subjected to any encumbrance whatsoever (Article 7 of the Law)    The Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia specifies the initial capital of the National Bank, which may increase by allocation of the net income. To increase the initial capital of the National Bank, prior approval of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia is required (Article 8 of the Law)   The National Bank establishes general and revaluation reserves. General reserves are established by allocation of 20% of the annual net income, until the level of the initial capital is reached. General reserves are intended for covering the general risks in the operations of the National Bank. Revaluation reserves are established from the non-realized revenues arising from changes in the exchange rate and the prices and are intended for covering the non-realized expenditures arising from changes in the exchange rate and the prices (Articles 84-88 of the Law) The amount of the net calculated revaluation revenues in the year is allocated from the income and is carried forward to the revaluation reserves. The  net income, after the allocation of the amounts for initial capital and for reserves, constitutes the revenue of the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia (Articles 89 of the Law). The loss of the National Bank is covered from the general reserves of the National Bank, and if they are insufficient, the loss is covered with funds from the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia or by issuing government securities. Preparation of a new Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia is underway, and it will be in full compliance with the European legislation for the central banks. The new law will further specify the financial independence of the National Bank. 10. What are the provisions governing the distribution of the central bank’s profits? 
The distribution of the National Bank’s profits is regulated by Articles 8, 84, 86 and 89 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004):   The initial capital of the National Bank may be increased by allocation of the net income  after obtaining prior approval of the Government of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 8 of the Law);    The National Bank establishes general and revaluation reserves. An amount of 20% of the annual net income is allocated to the general reserves, until the level of the initial capital is reached (Articles 84 and 86 of the Law).   Revaluation reserves in the amount of the net calculated revaluation revenues in the year are allocated from the gross income. The net income of the National Bank, after the allocation of the amounts for initial capital and for general reserves, is regarded as revenue of the Budget of the Republic of Macedonia (Article 89 of the Law). 
11. Does the ex-post review of the central bank’s accounts reflect adequate safeguards to prevent it from infringing on the bank’s independence? 
The Annual Financial Statement of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia is adopted by the Council of the National Bank of Macedonia  (Article 92 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004). The Annual Financial Statements of the National Bank are an integral part of the Annual Report of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, which is made public (Article 92 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia). The National Bank submits the Annual Report of the National Bank to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia not later than six months  after  expiration of the period  it refers to. (Article 55 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia). The Annual Report of the National Bank is submitted to the Parliament of the Republic of Macedonia in order to keep informed the Parliament.   Current legislation does not contain explicit provisions for conducting ex-post review and, so far, such form of analysis of the National Bank’s operations has not been used for infringing on the National Bank’s independence.  C. Prohibition of monetary financing and privileged access 

1. Please provide a copy of laws and regulations (in one of the official EU languages) governing the access of government to financial institutions (e.g. laws and other regulations governing the asset allocation of banks, savings and co-operative banks, insurance companies, social, pension and special funds, other institutional investors, investors compensation schemes, tax laws, etc.). 
Copies, in English, of the following laws that govern the access of the Government to the financial institutions are attached as follows: 1.  Law on Budgets ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 79/1993, 3/1994, 71/1996, Decision of 15/1999 - Decision of Constitutional Court, 46/2000, 11/2001, 93/2001, 46/2002, 24/2003, 85/2003 and 96/04), see 11_Annex_152.  Securities Law ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 63/2000, 103/2000, 34/2001, 4/2002, 37/2002, 31/2003 and 85/2003), see 11_Annex_16
2. Please indicate the respective provisions in these documents, as well as any other elements, which might constitute privileged access of the government to financial institutions. 
None of the mentioned documents, nor any other document contains provisions that might constitute privileged access of the government to financial institutions.   3. In particular, the following questions have to be addressed: a) Are there national legal provisions requiring or encouraging (through tax or other advantages) banks, insurance companies, pension funds, social security funds, investor compensation fund or other financial institutions to invest (e.g. a certain portion of their assets) in domestic government securities or other government liabilities? b) To what extent has the central bank contributed to the financing of the public sector? Describe the present situation both in legal terms and in practice. Describe the rules governing central bank credit to the government (limits, repayment, maturity, etc.), if such rules exist? c) Is the central bank authorised to buy public debt instruments directly on the primary market? 
a) There is no national law that contains provisions which require from the financial institutions to invest in government securities, nor there are provisions that provide tax relieves or other benefits for investing in government securities. 
b) Article 51 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia ("Official Gazette of RM" no. 3/02, 51/03, 85/03 and 40/04), hereinafter: Law, explicitly prohibits lending to and financing of the public sector. The National Bank does not guarantee for the assumed liabilities of the central government and the administrative bodies.  Exception to the restriction of the funding of the central government and the administrative bodies are the loans and borrowings with up to one-day maturity, with no possibility to be renewed or extended (Article 52 of the Law). 
c) The National Bank may not purchase directly (on the primary market) public debt instruments (Article 51 paragraph 2 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia). 
D. Monetary and exchange rate policy 

1. What are the final objectives, the intermediate targets and the operational targets of monetary policy? 
Pursuant to Article 3 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia ("Official Gazette of RM", No. 3/02, 51/03, 85/03 and 40/04) the main objective of the National Bank is the maintenance of the price stability. From the aspect of the strategy, the monetary policy of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia has been based on the application of the strategy of targeting the nominal Denar exchange rate against the Euro since October 1995. Thus the ultimate monetary objective is the maintenance of the price stability, while the intermediate objective is the maintenance of the stability of the nominal Denar exchange rate against the Euro. Having in mind the underdeveloped financial markets in the Republic of Macedonia, as well as the moderate elasticity of the interest rates in the banking system, the operational procedures of the NBRM are not focused on the explicit operational target. Therefore, the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia uses a combination of variables as an operational target - the banks' reserves and the interest rate on the Money Market, constantly monitoring their influence on the movements on the foreign exchange market.   2. Is the maintenance of price stability the primary objective of the central bank? Without prejudice to that objective, does the central bank support the general economic policy objectives of the government? 
The Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia explicitly defines the price stability as a main objective of the National Bank (Article 3 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004). Also the second paragraph of this Article  stipulates: "The National Bank shall support the economic policy of the country and the financial stability of the country without jeopardizing the realization of the main objective, and adhering to the principles of the market economy". 
3. Is the central bank act in accordance with the principle of an open market economy with free competition, favouring an efficient allocation of resources, and acting in compliance with the principles set out in Article 4 of the EC Treaty? 
The second paragraph of Article 3 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia (“Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004) stipulates: "The National Bank shall support the economic policy of the country and the financial stability of the country without jeopardizing the realization of the main objective, and adhering to the principles of the market economy." which, essentially, is in accordance with the principles of Article 4 of the European Community Treaty. 4. Do the basic tasks of the central bank include the following: definition and implementation of monetary policy, conduct of foreign exchange policy, holding and management of the official foreign reserves of the country, and promotion of the smooth operation of payment systems? 
The functions of the National Bank fully cover the areas listed in the question. Some of the functions of the National Bank are the following: definition and implementation of monetary policy, conduct of foreign exchange policy, holding and management of the official foreign reserves of the country. The Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004  (hereinafter referred to as: Law) does not contain an explicit provision regulating smooth operation of the payment systems. In accordance with Article 10 of the Law, the National Bank regulates the payment system according to a law.  The National Bank ensures smooth operation of the real time gross settlement system – MIPS (Macedonian Interbank Payment System). 
5. How is monetary policy carried out (reserve requirements, refinancing facilities, open market operations, major central bank interest rates, other monetary instruments)? What have been the main recent developments in the use of monetary instruments? To what extent have direct instruments of monetary control (such as credit ceilings, interest rate controls, etc.) been replaced by indirect, market-based instruments (such as open market operations, financing facilities, etc.)? Is the framework for monetary policy sufficient to allow policy makers to conduct successful stabilisation policies? 
After the monetary independence of the Republic of Macedonia proclaimed on 26.04.1992, the NBRM carried out significant changes and adjustments to the operational framework, in order to provide  sound and efficient implementation of the monetary policy. Namely, during the transition path of the monetary instruments, the NBRM succeeded in the gradual abandoning of the direct instruments and transferring to the complete application  of the indirect instruments. The last direct monetary instrument (the credit ceilings) was abolished in April 2000. The current set of instruments of the NBRM encompasses: 1. Reserve requirement Reserve requirement in Denars Reserve requirement in foreign exchange 2.  Open market operations  Issuance of CB bills Credit operations (credit auctions) Foreign exchange swap operations 3. Lombard credit The reserve requirement is a traditional monetary policy instrument of the NBRM, requiring from the banks and the savings houses in the Republic of Macedonia to allocate funds on the accounts with the Central Bank. Thus a control over the supply of money by the Central Bank and its indirect influence on the credit multiplication level is enabled.  All banks in the Republic of Macedonia are required to allocate 7.5% of the deposits encompassed in the basis for calculating the reserve requirement, while this ratio equals 2.5% for the saving houses. The basis of the reserve requirement is determined as an average of the balance of the deposits for each calendar day of the previous month. The period of maintaining the reserve requirement starts on the 11 day of the current month and lasts up till the 10 day of the following month. The banks fulfill the reserve requirement in Denars on average level, having right of a daily use of funds from the reserve requirement up to 80% of the requirement. The demand deposits on the banks' accounts with the NBRM and the cash in vaults of the banks are used as eligible assets for meeting the reserve requirement.  The saving houses allocate the reserve requirement on the special account with the National Bank, maintaining it on a fixed level.  The banks' reserve requirement in foreign exchange is allocated on special foreign exchange accounts of the National Bank abroad and it is maintained in Euros. The banks' reserve requirement in foreign exchange is maintained in a fixed amount.  The remuneration rate for the allocated funds in the reserve requirement in Denars currently equals 2%, while for the allocated funds in reserve requirement in foreign exchange the NBRM pays remuneration in the amount of the interest rate of the sight deposits abroad. Open market type operations The main monetary instrument the NBRM applies to compensate the influence of the autonomous factors that cause changes in its balance sheet are the CB bills.  The dominance of this instrument over the other monetary instruments of the NBRM originates from the influence of the autonomous factors on the banks' liquidity. Having in mind that starting from the mid-1999, the changes of these factors have been acting towards increasing the liquidity in the banking system on a net basis, the NBRM acts towards sterilization of the excess liquidity in the banking system through the CB bills issuance. The issuance of CB bills is conducted through auctions held twice a week, on a regular basis (on Wednesdays and Fridays). The CB bills are sold at a discounted value, and on the maturity date, the NBRM pays the face value of the CB bills. There are two types of CB bills auctions, volume tender and interest rate tender. Currently, the NBRM applies the volume tender, offering for sale an unlimited amount of CB bills with maturity of 7 and 28 days with fixed interest rates at the level of 6.0% and 9.0%, respectively. The NBRM signalizes its intentions by changing the official interest rates. The interest rate of the CB bills plays the key role as an official interest rate of the NBRM. Credit operations were the main instrument of the monetary policy of the NBRM in the period after the monetary independence until the second half of 1999. However, the increased foreign exchange inflow in the country after the cessation of the Kosvo crisis led to an increase in the liquidity in the banking system, decrease in the banks' indebtedness based on utilization of credits from the NBRM and to a gradual increase in the interest in purchasing CB bills. The credit operations are conducted through auctions, applying volume tender or interest rate tender. When approving credits through the auctions, the NBRM accepts the CB bills and the Treasury bills as collateral. The pledged securities amount to 105% of the credit.  Currently, due to the structural excess of liquidity in the banking system, the NBRM does not apply this monetary policy instrument. The foreign exchange swap operations are rarely used as an instrument by the NBRM, and their main objective is to mitigate the unexpected liquidity shocks caused by the influence of the autonomous factors through issuing or withdrawing Denar liquidity in the banking system. The foreign exchange swap transactions may be executed through auctions or on a bilateral basis. Their maturity and frequency are not standardized. This monetary instrument was more frequently applied in 2001 when a temporarily larger demand for foreign exchange on the foreign exchange market was registered. The Lombard credit is a short-term collateralized credit, available at discretion of banks facing a shortage of liquidity at the end of the working day. The CB bills and the Treasury bills of the RM are used as collateral for granting a Lombard credit. The pledged securities amount to 105% of the credit. The interest rate on the Lombard Credit currently equals 11%, representing also a ceiling for the market interest rate fluctuations. Generally, the framework of instruments of the NBRM enables smooth implementation of its stabilization monetary policy, which is evident from the low rates of inflation during the last decade, close to the rate of inflation registered within the EU. For the purpose of further adjustment of the NBRM's set of instruments to the monetary instruments of the EMU, the NBRM considers the possibility of introducing deposit facility in order to create a corridor of the market interest rates movement.  Simultaneously, by developing and reviving the Government securities market, further improvement of the open market operations through the introduction of repo operations with Government securities is planned.  The introduction of the repo transactions in the Republic of Macedonia will broaden the set of instruments for liquidity and risks management, not only regarding the monetary authorities, but also regarding the other participants in the market, it will increase the demand for securities and consequently, it will enhance the development of the financial markets.  6. Which factors hinder the conduct of monetary policy (e.g. elasticity of loans and domestic expenditure to interest rates, competition in the banking sector, changes in the structure of financial markets)? 
The monetary policy is based on the implementation of the exchange rate targeting strategy, which corresponds with the relevance of the exchange rate as the most direct and fastest channel of the monetary transmission in the Republic of Macedonia. Hence the monetary policy design is basically directed towards maintaining the exchange rate stability which largely contributes towards maintaining the price stability.  Basically, the NBRM monetary policy is conducted by a combination of direct interventions on the foreign exchange market and a change in the CB bills interest rate (short-term NBRM securities in domestic currency). The aim of the second instrument is to act towards changing the attractiveness of the domestic currency (i.e. the structure of the currency of denomination of the banks' portfolio), and thus to affect the supply of and the demand for foreign currency on the foreign exchange market. Also, the change in the CB bills interest rate (for example its increase) means an increase in the yield of such risk-free investment alternative, thus acting towards changing the banks' portfolio structure (such as lower credit supply, etc). One of the channels for realization of such effects is also the change in the banks' interest rate policy (as a reaction to the changes in the monetary policy) which would influence the demand for credits. The above also acts towards reducing the potential demand for foreign currency. Nonetheless, the monetary transmission through the interest rates channel is relatively restricted.  Principally, there are several factors that limit the monetary transmission process through the interest rates channel:   Insufficient development of the financial markets and insufficient diversification of the financial instruments portfolio;   Rigid banks' interest rate policy (as a result of the effect of the factors of structural and fundamental nature);   Structural excess liquidity in the banking system, where the Central Bank does not create liquidity in the banking system and its active influence on the banks' interest rates is restricted;   Relatively small elasticity of the demand for credits to households to the changes in the interest rates;    High degree of gray economy;   Factors of non-economic nature;   High degree of euroization (dollarization);   The insufficient development of the financial markets and the poor financial instruments portfolio is one of the major factors that hinder the monetary policy conduct. The shallow and underdeveloped financial markets do not have sufficient capacity for adequate monetary signals absorption and transmission. Having an insufficiently diversified securities portfolio and non-operational secondary market, the Central Bank is not in a position to actually perform open market operations, which significantly decreases the monetary policy efficiency.    The rigid banks' interest rate policy (where in early 2003 the non-responsiveness of the banks' interest rates gradually loses the intensity) was one of the key monetary transmission hindering factors. The nominal lending interest rates of the banks remained relatively high for a longer time period, with their dynamics not corresponding with the changes in the monetary policy design.  The rigid banks' interest rate policy was a result of the effect of several factors:  1.  Low level of savings in the banking system until 2002 perceived through the low share of the total deposits in the GDP. Nevertheless, this share permanently increases, reflecting the stabilization of the overall surrounding, the relatively high security which arises from the deposit insurance scheme, as well as the strengthened credibility of the banking system (particularly once its resistance to several shocks of non-economic nature was being confirmed). 
Share of the total deposits in the GDP (in %) 

19992000200120022003
2.  Maintenance of a relatively high percentage of so-called "bad loans" in the total banks' credit portfolio;  3.  Low degree of high-quality competition in the banking system, partially evident through the maintenance of wide interest rate spreads until 2003 (for more details see II_VI_B_3). However, the entrance of foreign capital in the Macedonian banking system and the more active business policy of most of the banks resulted in a gradual increase in the degree of competitiveness, with the responsiveness of the banks to the changes in the monetary policy being gradually increased;  4.  Inefficient and long procedures for foreclosure which result in the need of incorporating additional premium in the interest rates.  The gradual exhaustion of the effect of these factors resulted in a downward trend of the banks' interest rates in mid 2003 and larger responsiveness to the Central Bank signals shown in the chart below.  Interest rates (in %) 4.009.0014.0019.0024.0029.00VI-XI-IV-IX-II-200VII200XII200200200III-200VII200200VI-200XI-200IV-200
Average short-term lending interest rateof the banksCB bills interest rate (28days
Weighted interest rate at auctions ofDenar credits  (7 days)Interest rate on the Money Market

  One of the rationales behind the poor responsiveness of the banks' interest rates to the monetary signals is also the structural excess liquidity in the banking system. The excess liquidity is partially caused by the high foreign exchange inflows and their purchase by the NBRM in late 1999, i.e. after the Kosovo crisis. It is also illustrated by the lower interest of the banks in using NBRM credits (through the credit auctions) in this period, with the last credit auction being conducted in April 2000. Under such circumstances, the CB bills were given the role of a major monetary instrument, through which the excess liquidity is absorbed. Thus the Central Bank is not a source of financing the needs of the banks, and the absence of a shortage of liquidity in the system does not allow active "dictating" of the interest rates by the Central Bank. The main channel through which the Central Bank affects the banks' interest rate policy are the CB bills auctions, thus sterilizing a portion of the excess liquidity or increasing the supply of foreign exchange on the foreign exchange market by offering higher yield of such risk-free short-term securities. Taking into account the poor supply of financial instruments in which the excess liquidity could be invested, these liquid funds represent a potential demand for foreign exchange on the foreign exchange market, which means a larger burden for the monetary policy (given the de facto fixed exchange rate strategy).    The poor elasticity of the credits to households to the changes in the interest rates is an additional factor that impedes the monetary policy conduct. In 2003, the banks started lending intensively to the households, when the banking loans regained the role of additional source of purchasing power of this sector after a longer period of time. Thus, at the end of June 2004, compared to the end of 2002, the banks' total placements with the households were twice higher. Taking into consideration the short time period in which the banking credits are used as a source of financing the personal consumption, in this period the demand for such credits is relatively inelastic to the changes in the interest rates.    The negative effect of the gray economy on the monetary policy conduct is reflected through the high amount of currency in circulation outside the banks (Denar and foreign exchange), the channeling of which in the banking system would also mean higher financial intermediation and more efficient monetary policy conduct;    The factors of non-economic nature, primarily the security crisis in the neighboring countries (the Kosovo crisis in 1999) and in the country (2001) resulted in an environment of uncertainty and restraint of the economic agents. In such conditions, the banks compensated the risk caused by these factors by incorporating higher risk premium in their interest rates. Consequently, they responded very slowly to the gradual decrease in the Central Bank interest rates. Given the gradual stabilization of the overall developments, and consequently, the exhaustion of the relevance of such factors, larger responsiveness of the banks' interest rate policy to the changes in the Central Bank interest rates was evident in early 2003.    One of the factors that contributed towards lower efficiency in the monetary policy conduct is the relatively high degree of euroization of the Macedonian banking system. The high inflation rates at the beginning of the monetary independence considerably disturbed the confidence in the domestic currency, which resulted in evident preferences to save in foreign currency. Thus from 1999 to September 2001 (prior to the beginning of the Euro conversion and the intensive depositing of the foreign currency, which were previously outside the banking channels, in the banking system) the average share of foreign exchange deposits in the total banks' deposit potential equaled 49,8%, while from October 2001 to June 2004 it equaled 65,7%. Also, in addition to the portion of the credits extended to the private sector, denominated in foreign currency, part of the Denar credits is with a foreign exchange clause aimed at hedging against the exchange rate risk. Thus if the amount of the Denar credits with foreign exchange clause is added to the total amount of foreign exchange credits, the share of these credits in the banks' total placements amounts to 33,6%, on average, from January 2003 to June 2004. Notwithstanding all the above hindering factors, the NBRM quite successfully preserves the price stability, as a primary monetary objective. 7. Describe the major characteristics and objectives of your exchange rate regime and policy: anchor, choice of the central rates, width of the fluctuation bands, etc. 
According to the regulations, the Denar exchange rate is freely formed on the market, pursuant to Article 33 of the Law on Foreign Exchange Operations ("Official Gazette of RM" No. 34/01, 49/01, 103/01, 54/02 and 53/03), while in the practice, the NBRM conducts a de facto pegged exchange rate policy. Since October 1995, the NBRM has been applying a monetary strategy of targeting the nominal exchange rate of the Denar (until the Euro conversion in 2002 against the Deutsche Mark, and later, against the Euro). The determination of the Republic of Macedonia to use the exchange rate as a nominal anchor is primarily due to the nature of the Macedonian economy. The Macedonian economy is small and open, with an average share of the foreign trade in the GDP of 80,8% in the 1999 - 2003 period, while the share in the world trade is 0,025%. Also, typical for Macedonia is the high export concentration, as well as the relatively high degree of euroization of the economy (which is continuously monitored through the currency substitution). The pegging to one currency rather than to a currency basket is due to the dominant position of the Euro in the economy. Thus, around 69% of the total foreign trade is Euro-denominated (since the EU is a dominant trading partner - in the first six months of 2004, the foreign trade with the EU  accounts for 53,6% of the total foreign trade of the RM), in 2003 and 2004, the turnover in Euro on the foreign exchange market and on the exchange offices market on average accounts for 70% and 56,5% of the total turnover, respectively, and also, the Euro is the dominant currency in the banks' balance sheets (at the end of March 2004, the share of the Euro on the assets side and the liabilities side of the banks equaled 82,2% and 80,7%, respectively). 8. How is the exchange rate policy implemented? What are its instruments (interventions, monetary policy, fiscal policy, capital control)? What is the intervention policy – if any – (currencies used, financing, sterilisation)? 
The maintenance of the exchange rate stability, and hence the price stability is based on a combined use of the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia direct interventions on the foreign exchange market, indirect monetary policy instruments, coordination between the monetary and the fiscal policy and partial liberalization of the capital flows.  The policy of stable exchange rate, when used as a nominal anchor requires frequent National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia direct interventions in the foreign exchange market. The interventions are contingent upon the seasonal movements and are aimed at meeting the demand and accumulation of the excess foreign exchange. The exchange rates the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia quotes and the interventions are conducted by using the exchange rates currently prevailing on the market. The National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia quotes and the carried out interventions are usually in Euro. Major monetary instrument aimed at efficient liquidity management by the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia are the CB bills auctions. Hence, the excess liquidity created through the foreign exchange transactions (and the other autonomous factors) is sterilized through the CB bills. Basically, the CB bills should provide an optimum liquidity level which will not potentially destabilize the foreign exchange market and the exchange rate stability. Setting the budget  at a relatively low level in line with the balance of payments and the need of building an optimum level of foreign exchange reserves is also a prudential policy in the maintenance of a stable exchange rate. The coordination between the monetary and the fiscal policy ensures that the Denar issuance by the Government through its Treasury Account is in line with the developments on the foreign exchange market and the banking system liquidity. The Treasury bills issuance and introduction by the Ministry of Finance also contributed towards improving the liquidity management, and consequently, conducting a  policy of stable exchange rate. The capital transactions liberalization process in the Republic of Macedonia is gradual and carried out in stages, which is consistent with the applied exchange rate policy (for more details see 04_I_4). 9. Are any reforms of the exchange rate policy envisaged? If yes, why? What part does the prospect of EU accession play in this respect? 
The analysis of the features of the Macedonian economy (for more details see 11_I_D_7) points to the large significance of the exchange rate, primarily from the aspect of its effect on the inflation dynamics. Thus for the institutions responsible for conducting monetary policy, the exchange rate is a variable of great importance. On the other hand, the process of liberalization of the capital flows and the foreign exchange regime as a whole, imposes the issue of a possible change of the current exchange rate regime. Having in mind the gradual liberalization of the movement of the short-term capital, the need for changing the current strategy of exchange rate targeting is not deemed necessary in near future. From the aspect of the alternatives of the current exchange rate regime, the features of the Macedonian economy allow gradual introduction of limited exchange rate flexibility, which compared to the current regime would also enable more flexible implementation of the monetary policy and distribution of the absorption of possible pressures through the exchange rate (within the limited flexibility) and through the domestic interest rates. The transition to a larger exchange rate flexibility would not be completed if the assumptions for successful change in the exchange rate regime were not fulfilled (stable foreign exchange market, fiscal consolidation, adequate prudent regulations of the banks for appropriate exchange rate risk management, etc.). The accession of the Republic of Macedonia to the European Union, hence acquiring a status of a member-state with derogation, would basically not result in a change in the exchange rate policy directions. Namely, the imposed criterion for a stable exchange rate (part of the Maastricht criteria for nominal convergence) and compulsory membership in ERM 2 for a two-year period (with permitted margins of ±15%) completely corresponds to the current exchange rate strategy, as well as with the future directions for its layout. Within this framework, it is important to mention that basically, the Republic of Macedonia has been meeting the criteria for nominal convergence (Maastricht criteria) for a longer period of time, as a presumption for joining the EMU (except for the criterion for the long-term interest rates, having in mind the fact that the development of the financial markets and the long-term financial instruments is in its initial phase, so there is no comparable long-term interest rate).   10. Are there any attempts to measure equilibrium (real) exchange rates? What has been the recent evolution of the equilibrium real exchange rate? 
The NBRM compiles and monitors the real effective exchange rate (for more details see II_I_1). No attempt has been made so far to measure the equilibrium real exchange rate. Nevertheless, one of the planned projects (expected to be launched in 2005) is also the measurement of the equilibrium real effective exchange rate. Considering the features of the data time series in the economies in transitions (short time series with several structural breaks), the measurement would be based on a non-structural approach. 11. What is the link between the exchange rate policy and monetary policy? 
When using the exchange rate as a nominal anchor, the correlation between the monetary policy and exchange rate policy is extremely high. Actually, the implementation  of the strategy of exchange rate targeting implies a contemporaneous conduct of the monetary and exchange rate policies. The reasons for using the exchange rate as a nominal anchor originate from the features of the Macedonian economy. The factors of higher importance contributing to a larger significance of the exchange rate when creating and conducting the monetary policy, are the following:   Size and openness of the Macedonian economy. The Macedonian economy is small and open, with the average share of the foreign trade in the GDP in the 1999 - 2003 period equaling 80,8%, while the share in the international trade equals 0,025%.    Currency concentration of the total foreign trade, i.e. the dominance of the Euro in the total trade. Thus the share of the Euro in the foreign trade currency structure in 2003 equaled 69,4%. Thus larger fluctuations of the Denar - Euro exchange rate may imply larger distortions in the total foreign trade.   High export concentration. The low diversification of the export also implies a danger of distracting the total export activity in case of larger exchange rate fluctuations.   High correlation between the changes in the exchange rate and the movement of the inflation, with the research showing that about 20% of the price variations being generated from the changes in the exchange rate.   High level of euroization of the Macedonian economy. Thus in the first half of 2004, the average share of the foreign exchange deposits in the total money supply M4 equals 44,8%. The utilization of the exchange rate as a nominal anchor of the monetary policy generates permanent successful results in maintaining the price stability, as the most favorable environment for a long-term economic development. Hence, the exchange rate and the monetary policies are two complementary segments, with the layout of the first policy being in function of successful realization of the objectives of the second.  12. How will the liberalisation of capital movements affect the monetary and exchange rate policies? How vulnerable is your economy to a significant appreciation or depreciation of the currency? 
The liberalization of the capital movement should basically reflect on the correlation between the demand and the supply on the foreign exchange market, which in case of using the exchange rate as a nominal anchor may cause a distortion of its stability. In case there is a de facto fixed exchange rate, the higher inflows or outflows would have a direct effect on the monetary policy conduct through changing the interest rates of the NBRM and through interventions on the foreign exchange market. If larger exchange rate flexibility is accepted, after the initial depreciation or appreciation of the exchange rate (within the limited flexibility), re-stabilization of the movements on a medium-run can be expected (through the Money Market and foreign trade mechanism). Thus if the inflows and the outflows cause no deviation of the exchange rate from the set margins, no effects of higher significance on the monetary and exchange rate policies can be expected. The effects of the capital inflows and outflows are presented normatively, since the Macedonian economy has not faced larger problems in this area, yet. Having in mind that full liberalization of the short-term capital has not been performed, and that there are also certain implicit limitations to the already liberalized short-term transactions (for more details see 04_I_4), no larger changes in the monetary and the exchange rate policies in the following period are expected.  The exposure of certain sectors in regard to the economy's vulnerability to the changes in the exchange rate is different. Hence, the banking sector has long open currency position, because of which it is more vulnerable to the appreciation of the exchange rate. However, the performed stress-test to the banking system (the stress-testing is prepared in the NBRM on a quarterly basis, in order to monitor the safety and the soundness of the banking system) more efficiently shows that the banking system is highly resistant to larger fluctuations of the exchange rate. The results from the stress-test analysis show that the Macedonian banking system is relatively stable and resistant to the foreign exchange risk, as well as to the combination of the individual risks (credit risk, foreign exchange risk, interest rates risk). Also in such a combination of shocks to the banking system, no larger problems in maintaining the capital adequacy ratio are noticed.  The previous experiences (the Kosovo crisis in 1999, the security crisis in the Republic of Macedonia in 2001) also prove this, when despite the significant negative shocks, a systemic banking crisis was avoided.  On the other hand, the banks face with an indirect credit risk, originating from the currency structure of the corporate sector balance sheets (higher vulnerability to depreciation, which can be even larger in case of liberalization in using foreign loans by the enterprises - further increase in their foreign exchange liabilities). However, having in mind that the credit risk was also included in the stress-testing, the banking sector proved to be relatively resistant also to this type of risk.  The "households" sector is the main holder of the foreign exchange savings, while its share in the total foreign exchange loans is insignificant. Thus on 30.06.2004, the share of the foreign currency households' deposits in the total foreign currency deposits equals 77,5%, while the share of the households' foreign exchange loans in the total foreign exchange loans is insignificant. Thus the households sector is more vulnerable to appreciation of the exchange rate.  Regarding the external sector, the effects of changing the exchange rate would rather be felt in the imports than in the exports, which is characterized with large dependence on the imports and production concentration, with the final effect being uncertain. Thus the possible depreciation of the domestic currency will initially imply negative effects upon the exports due to more expensive raw materials.  In addition, the export is being dominated by products (iron and steel, textile and tobacco) with which the Macedonian economy does not have comparative advantage on the international market and the production of which is more rigid, thus hampering the restructuring of the facilities as a reaction to the positive shocks to the competitiveness (such as the depreciation of the Denar). This statement can be proved by the single devaluation of the Denar in July 1997. Namely, analyzing the devaluation effects on the competitiveness of the Macedonian economy, no clear effect towards higher export, nor reduced import of goods immediately after the devaluation can be registered. An improvement in the current account (almost balanced) of the balance of payments was registered in 1999, with no significant improvement in the trade balance being registered.  13. What is the situation of foreign exchange reserves? Are there any targets for the size of these? How are the reserves managed? 
Having a still limited access to the international capital market and a simultaneous  implementation of a de facto pegged exchange rate, the gross foreign exchange reserves adequacy is estimated at about four-month coverage of the import of goods and services. The analysis of the gross foreign exchange reserves from the aspect of this criterion indicates a reasonable international liquidity.  Gross foreign exchange reserves (in US Dollar million) 350,0450,0550,0650,0750,0850,019992000200120022003Source: NBRM 
Gross foreign exchange reserves (in months of coverage of the import of goods and services) 

19992000200120022003Source: NBRM The foreign exchange reserves of the Republic of Macedonia are managed by the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia (Articles 25 and 26 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia, “Official Gazette of RM” No. 3/2002, 51/2003, 85/2003 and 40/2004). In their management, the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia follows the liquidity, security and profitability principles (Article 28 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia). The National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia Council sets the Policy of Foreign Exchange Reserves Management (Article 64 of the Law on the National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia). The Policy defines qualitative and quantitative limits which ensure adherence to the aforementioned principles in the foreign exchange reserves management. The above principles are adhered to by managing certain risks such as:  The credit risk is managed by placing the foreign exchange reserves in instruments of foreign central banks, international institutions and commercial banks enjoying one of the two highest short-term credit ratings given by at least two internationally recognized rating agencies. The foreign exchange reserves are held in the form of deposits, monetary gold, cash and checks in convertible foreign currency, foreign exchange and foreign exchange deposits, special drawing rights, notes, certificates of deposits, bonds and other debt securities in convertible foreign currency, forward and repo agreements. Investment in shares and other equity securities, debt instruments of private corporations and derivative instruments is not allowed.    The liquidity risk is managed by determining the basic maturity structure. The share of the funds at immediate disposal and the funds with maturity of up to 30 days is the largest. The maturity structure determination results from the exchange rate policy and from the need of National Bank of the Republic of Macedonia interventions on the foreign exchange market.    The currency risk is managed by using the basic structure of currency of denomination, determined by the structure of the currency of denomination of the liabilities. This structure is dominated by the Euro, followed by the US Dollar, whereas the share of other convertible currencies is irrelevant. A portion of the foreign exchange reserves is in the form of monetary gold. The interest rate risk in the securities portfolio is controlled by determining its basic duration.  
14. How has the gross external debt stock developed? Please indicate the main sources of growth and its structural elements (e.g. maturity, creditor, currency composition etc.)? What will the past debt accumulation mean in terms of medium- and long-term growth of amortisation? How has the servicing of the external debt been managed? 
As of 30.06.2004, the amount of the external debt of the Republic of Macedonia totaled US Dollar 1.801,20 million or 34,80% of the projected GDP for 2004. The external debt of the General Government amounts to US Dollar 1.247,84 million or 24,10% of the projected GDP for 2004. After gaining its independence, the Republic of Macedonia was not in a position to service the due liabilities to foreign creditors regularly due to several political and economic factors: the unresolved issues regarding the distribution of assets and the liabilities after the disintegration of the former SFRY, the low level of foreign exchange reserves, the loss of markets in the former Yugoslavia and the fall in the export inflows, the sanctions towards SRY, the decline in the domestic output, the trade embargo imposed by Greece, the political issues regarding the non-recognition of the country and the inheritance of the membership rights in the international financial institutions.  In 1994, the process of determining and regulating the liabilities towards foreign creditors started alongside the process of regulating the relations among the successor countries of former SFRY. At the same time, the Republic of Macedonia concluded its first arrangement with the IMF and started to service its liabilities to the international financial institutions (the IMF and the IBRD) regularly. In 1995, the Republic of Macedonia assumed a total debt of US Dollar 396,88 million towards the member states of the Paris Club of Creditors. A larger portion of this debt in the amount of US Dollar 313,06 million is a debt of debtors operating on the territory of the Republic of Macedonia, while US Dollar 83,82 million is the debt assumed from the former SFRY, which constitutes 5,40% of the total debt of the former SFRY. This percentage has been set according to the distribution of the quota of the former SFRY in the IMF between the successor states. Amount of US Dollar 324,50 million out of the total assumed debt is rescheduled, with the amount of US Dollar 222,19 million being rescheduled with maturity of 15,5 years, and US Dollar 102,31 million are with maturity of 6,5 years. The remaining part of the debt in the amount of US Dollar 72,38 million was not encompassed in the rescheduling, i.e. repayment according to the current terms was agreed. In March 1997, as agreed, the Republic of Macedonia assumed 5,40% or US Dollar 228,73 million of the total debt of the former SFRY to the London Club of Creditors. This amount was covered with the issuance of C bonds, the repayment of which is divided in 30 semi-annual installments.  With the liabilities to the Paris Club and the London Club of Creditors being regulated, the process of determining and regulating the liabilities based on external debt of the Republic of Macedonia assumed from the former SFRY was completed. Parallel to the process of determining and regulating the relations with the international financial institutions, the Paris Club and the London Club of Creditors, the Republic of Macedonia was extended new loans and credits by the official creditors, primarily intended for balance of payments support, stimulating the private sector development, structural reforms in certain activities from the social and health care area, as well as for improving the infrastructure, i.e. the road network and the energetic systems. In 1999, due to the negative economic consequences of the Kosovo crisis, the Paris Club of Creditors approved restructuring of the liabilities of the Republic of Macedonia, maturing in 01.04.1999 – 31.03.2000 period. In order to mitigate the consequences of the crisis, credits intended for the balance of payments support  were used once more during this period.  
Table 1: External debt by debtors 1999 – 30.06.2004 (In millions of US Dollars) 1999  2000 2001 2002 2003 30.06.2004 Total external debt 1.502 1.548 1.494 1.635 1.813 1.801 Public sector 1.296 1.343 1.229 1.321 1.487 1.461 General Government 1.029 1.074 1.050 1.135 1.257 1.248    Central Government  976 1.024 1.008 1.095 1.215 1.208    Public funds 53 49 42 40 41 40 NBRM 102 96 71 67 68 55 Public enterprises 164 173 108 119 162 158 Private sector 207 205 265 314 325 340 Private banks 101 83 87 110 86 64 Non-banking private sector 105 122 178 204 240 276 Total debt as % of the GDP
40,90 43,10 43,50 43,40 38,80 34,80* Government debt as % of the GDP
28,00 29,90 30,60 30,10 26,90 24,10* Servicing of liabilities as % of the Export of goods and services
10,90 11,60 14,80 17,30 14,20 13,80 Source: NBRM Processed by: NBRM  Calculated according to the current GDP.  The indicator is calculated on the basis of the amount of serviced liabilities (it encompasses repayments of principal and interest based on the long-term debt and repayments of interest based on the short-term debt) and the amount of the export of goods and services for the respective period. *Based on the estimates of the GDP for 2004. Despite the assumption of part of the total debt of the Former SFRY and the new indebtedness, the Republic of Macedonia succeeded in preserving the external debt at a prudential and sustainable level. That is also proven by the indicators for the level of indebtedness of the Republic of Macedonia prepared according to the IBRD methodology at the end of 2003:  -  the total external debt relative to the average GDP registered in the last three years equals 45,80%, according to which the Republic of Macedonia belongs to the group of moderately indebted countries; the total external debt according to the average export of goods and services in the last three years equals 122,18%, according to which the Republic of Macedonia belongs to the group of less indebted countries; and the total debt servicing according to the average export of goods and services in the last three years equals 16,12%, according to which the Republic of Macedonia belongs to the group of less indebted countries; total repayments of interest according to the average export of goods and services in the last three years equals 3,55%, according to which the Republic of Macedonia belongs to the group of less indebted countries. Three of the aforementioned indicators show that the Republic of Macedonia is a less indebted country, and only the indicator total debt according to the GDP ranges the Republic of Macedonia in the group of moderately indebted country. 
Тable 2: External debt by debtors 1999 – 30.06.2004 (In % of the total debt) 
1999  2000 2001 2002 2003 30.06.2004 Total external debt 100,00 100,00 100,00 100,00 100,00 100,00 Public sector 86,20  86,70 82,30 80,80 82,10 81,10 General Government 68,50  69,40 70,30 69,40 69,30 69,30    Central Government  65,00 66,20 67,50 67,00 67,10 67,10   Public Funds 3,60 3,20 2,80 2,50 2,30 2,20 NBRM 6,80  6,20 4,70 4,10 3,80 3,10 Public enterprises 10,90 11,20 7,20 7,30 9,00 8,80 Private sector 13,80  13,30 17,70 19,20 17,90 18,90 Private banks 6,70  5,40 5,80 6,70 4,70 3,60 Non-banking private sector  7,00 7,90 11,90 12,50 13,20 15,30 Source: NBRM Processed by: NBRM 
In recent years, moderate, although constant increase in the indebtedness of the private non-banking sector has been registered, which is due to several factors: a) more favorable terms for borrowings from abroad from the aspect of the price of capital than those of the domestic banks; b) adoption of a new legal framework in 2001, envisaging full liberalization in the indebtedness of the residents of the private sector, without limiting the purposes, thus abandoning the imperative for external financing only for the export-oriented projects, typical for the previous period. Таble 3: External debt by maturity and creditors, 1999 - 30.06.2004 (In millions of US Dollars)     1999  2000 2001 2002 2003 30.06.2004 Long-term debt 1.447 1.495 1.429 1.571 1.771 1.763     Multilateral creditors 702 720 689 757 921 941         IMF 102 82 71 67 68 55         IBRD 116 123 124 145 181 193         IDA 222 250 255 296 358 363         IFC 57 57 33 18 17 15         EIB  68 69 75 102 116 120         EBRD 72 74 62 32 34 51         EUROFIMA 17 17 14 12         CEDB 14 17 17         EU 41 37 44 65 112 110         IFAD         EAR    Bilateral creditors 320 332 284 277 273 248 Private creditors 425 443 456 537 577 573        London Club 245 253 262 254 243 238        Other 180 191 194 283 334 335 Short-term debt 55 53 65 64 42 38 Total external debt 1.502 1.548 1.494 1.635 1.813 1.801    Long-term debt - structure by the type of creditor - in percentages       Multilateral creditors 48,50 48,10 48,20 48,20 52,00 53,40       Bilateral creditors 22,10 22,20 19,90 17,60 15,40 14,10        Commercial creditors 29,40 29,70 31,90 34,20 32,60 32,50 Source: NBRM Processed by: NBRM The maturity structure of the external debt is favorable, having in mind the fact that 97,9% of the total debt accounts for the long-term debt. The share of the credits extended by international financial organizations accounts for 53,34% of the total external debt, with the largest portion of the credits being extended by the IDA and the IBRD under standard terms, which means extended grace periods and maturities. The short-term debt completely accounts for the private sector. Loans, trade and trade-related credits dominate the instrument structure of the external debt. The currency structure of the external debt is dominated by the share of credits denominated in US Dollars, Euros and Special Drawing Rights (SDR). 
Таbel 4: Currency structure of the external debt 1999 – 30.06.2004 (In % of the total debt) 
1999  2000 2001 2002 2003 30.06.2004 Total external debt 100,00 100,00 100,00 100,00 100,00 100,00 USD 48,00 49,10 48,30 41,30  35,70 34,50 SDR 21,70 22,60 22,70 22,80  24,20 24,10 EUR 6,70  11,90 17,10 33,60  38,70 39,30 Other currencies 23,60 16,40 11,90 2,20 1,40  2,10     DEM 16,40 10,80 7,30 0,00 0,00 0,00     CHF 2,30 2,20 1,80 1,60 1,00 1,70     GBP 0,30 0,30 0,30 0,10 0,10 0,10     JPY 0,50 0,50 0,40 0,40 0,20 0,20     Other 4,10 2,70 2,10 0,20 0,10 0,10 Source: NBRM Processed by: NBRM 
The Republic of Macedonia regularly services the liabilities arising from the public debt towards multilateral, bilateral and private creditors, which is a fulfillment of the strategic commitment of the Government for regular servicing of the liabilities based on external debt. The budget allocations for servicing of the external debt are obligatorily determined in the annual Budget of the Republic of Macedonia.  Table 5: Plan of repayment of principal based on external debt by debtors  (In millions of US Dollars) 
As of June 30, 2004 Until the end of 2004  2005  2006  2007  2008  2009  2010  Other years Total external debt 1.801 102  141 129 138 139 155 138 787 Public sector 1.461 43 81  93  100 112 125 125 781 General Government 1.248 32  65 64 66 83 106 108 724    Central Government  1.208 30 60 60 61 77 103 105 713    Public funds 40 12 NBRM 55 10 10 16 9  1  1  0 Public enterprises 158 7  19 18 19 18 17 57 Private sector 340 59  59 36 38 27 30 13 5 Private banks 64 11  16 9 5 8 5 0 0 Non-banking private sector 276 48  43 27 33 19 26 13 5 Source: NBRM Processed by: NBRM 
For the purpose of efficient debt management, especially of the external debt, in 2001 the Ministry of Finance prepared a Public Debt Management Strategy, which was adopted by the Government of the Republic of Macedonia. Since its adoption, this strategy has been used in the indebtedness projections, as well as in the preparation of the annual Decisions on the macroeconomic policy and the Decisions on the foreign exchange policy and the balance of payments projection. The main purpose of the Public Debt Management Strategy is to prevent the external debt from exceeding the limit of 40% of the current GDP. The Strategy also envisages changes in the public debt structure i.e. reduced share in the external public debt at the expense of larger share of the domestic debt. Thus the Government plans to finance itself by issuing bonds with maturity varying from 2 to 10 years, initially only on the domestic market, which will probably happen in the second half of 2005. After 2006, the Government will commence preparations for issuance of long-term bonds on the international market, if needed. In order to be more efficient in managing the public debt, a separate Debt Management Office within the Ministry of Finance was established.  A preparation of the new Law on Public Debt is underway, the adoption of which is expected in the beginning of 2005. Thus, the legal framework in this area will be completed, enabling more precise definition of the key issues for successful management of the Government debt, including also the debtors, the criteria and the limits for domestic and external indebtedness, issuance of guarantees. The new Law on Public Debt provides for continuation of the practice of preparing and implementing medium-term strategies for public debt management, which will be approved by the Parliament and updated on annual basis.  
